District of Columbia statutes.
2-1217.35d

Bond authorization.

The Council approves and authorizes the issuance of one or more series of Bonds in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $40 million to fund the project. The Bonds, which may be issued from time to time, in one or more series, shall be tax-exempt or taxable as the Mayor shall determine and shall be payable and secured as provided in §  2-1217.35e(c). The proceeds of the Bonds shall be used to pay Development Costs of the project and the financing costs incurred by the District or the Development Sponsor and to fund capitalized interest and required reserves.

June 21, 2014, D.C. Law 20-110, § 203, 61 DCR 4315